Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.073

Hearing prior to appeal—Conduct of hearing.

Following its receipt of a notice for hearing in accordance with RCW 41.40.068, a hearing shall be held by the director or a duly authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. Such hearing shall be conducted and governed in all respects by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 175 s 87; 1969 c 128 s 15; 1953 c 200 s 23. Formerly RCW 41.40.414.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.